Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.704

Proceeds of sale—Deposit or payment by receiver.

The proceeds of the sale less any amounts for costs and charges incurred in safekeeping and sale must be deposited by the receiver in a financial institution, in trust for the benefit of the person entitled to the property. The sale proceeds must be paid by the receiver to the person upon presentation of satisfactory evidence of the person's right to the funds.

[ 1997 c 397 s 80.]